Hawaii statutes.
§612-20 Requests for exemption or excuse.
If a person who is exempt or who believes oneself to be entitled to be excused
from jury duty, is summoned as a juror, even though the person did not request
exemption or excuse previously, or was not exempted or excused by the clerk,
the person may make the person's request for exemption or excuse to the judge
of the court for which the person is summoned. The request may be made to the
clerk or bailiff, who shall deliver it to the judge and, if sufficient in substance,
it shall be received as an excuse for nonattendance in person. [L 1973, c 191,
pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 366, §12]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next